sl-SI: Sorta napitka v prahu: Kava; Elektrolitski napitek; Energijski napitek; Voda z okusom; Sadni punč; Vroča čokolada; Ledeni čaj; Limonada; Beljakovinski napitek; Športni napitek; Drugo
hu: Italpor fajtája: Kávé; Elektrolitital; Energiaital; Ízesített víz; Puncs; Forró csokoládé; Jegestea; Limonádé; Fehérjeturmix; Sportital; Egyéb
es: Variedad de bebida en polvo: Café; Bebida con electrolitos; Bebida energética; Agua saborizada; Ponche de frutas; Chocolate caliente; Té helado; Limonada; Batido de proteínas; Bebida deportiva; Otro
it: Varietà di bevande in polvere: Caffè; Bevanda elettrolitica; Energy drink; Acqua aromatizzata; Punch alla frutta; Cioccolata calda; Tè freddo; Limonata; Frullato proteico; Sport drink; Altro
ja: 粉飲料の種類: コーヒー; 電解質飲料; エナジードリンク; フレーバーウォーター; フルーツポンチ; ホットチョコレート; アイスティー; レモネード; プロテインシェイク; スポーツドリンク; その他
zh-CN: 冲泡饮料品种: 咖啡; 电解质饮料; 能量饮料; 风味水; 什锦果汁; 热巧克力; 冰茶; 柠檬水; 蛋白奶昔; 运动饮料; 其他
lt-LT: Tirpių gėrimų miltelių rūšis: Kava; Elektrolitų gėrimas; Energinis gėrimas; Aromatizuotas vanduo; Vaisių punšas; Karštas šokoladas; Šalta arbata; Limonadas; Baltyminis kokteilis; Sportinis gėrimas; Kita
ko: 분말형 음료 종류: 커피; 전해질 음료; 에너지 드링크; 가향 워터; 과일 펀치; 핫초코; 아이스티; 레모네이드; 단백질 셰이크; 스포츠 드링크; 기타
hr-HR: Vrsta instant napitka u prahu: Kava; Napitak s elektrolitima; Energetski napitak; Voda s okusom; Voćni punč; Topla čokolada; Ledeni čaj; Limunada; Proteinski shake; Sportski napitak; Ostalo
el: Ποικιλία ενεργειακών ροφημάτων: Καφές; Ρόφημα ηλεκτρολυτών; Ενεργειακό ποτό; Αρωματισμένο νερό; Φρουτοπόντς; Ζεστή σοκολάτα; Παγωμένο τσάι; Λεμονάδα; Ρόφημα πρωτεΐνης; Αθλητικό ποτό; Άλλο
ru: Сорт порошкового напитка: Кофе; Электролитный напиток; Энергетический напиток; Вода со вкусом; Фруктовый пунш; Горячий шоколад; Холодный чай; Лимонад; Протеиновый коктейль; Спортивный напиток; Другое
fi: Juomasekoitelajike: Kahvi; Elektrolyyttijuoma; Energiajuoma; Maustettu vesi; Hedelmäbooli; Kaakao; Jäätee; Limonadi; Proteiinipirtelö; Urheilujuoma; Muu
bg-BG: Сорт прахообразна напитка: Кафе; Електролитна напитка; Енергийна напитка; Овкусена вода; Плодов пунш; Горещ шоколад; Студен чай; Лимонада; Протеинов шейк; Спортна напитка; Друго
zh-TW: 粉狀飲品種類: 咖啡; 電解質飲料; 能量飲料; 風味水; 水果綜合飲料; 熱巧克力; 冰茶; 檸檬水; 高蛋白奶昔; 運動飲料; 其他
sk-SK: Druhy nápojových zmesí v prášku: Káva; Elektrolytový nápoj; Energetický nápoj; Ochutená voda; Ovocný punč; Horúca čokoláda; Ľadový čaj; Limonáda; Proteínový nápoj; Športový nápoj; Iné
tr: Toz içecek çeşidi: Kahve; Elektrolit içeceği; Enerji içeceği; Aromalı su; Meyve kokteyli; Sıcak çikolata; Buzlu çay; Limonata; Protein shake; Sporcu içeceği; Diğer
de: Auswahl an Getränkepulver: Kaffee; Elektrolyt-Getränk; Energydrink; Wasser mit Geschmack; Fruchtpunsch; Heiße Schokolade; Eistee; Limonade; Protein-Shake; Sportgetränk; Sonstige
th: เครื่องดื่มผงหลากหลายชนิด: กาแฟ; เครื่องดื่มเกลือแร่; เครื่องดื่มชูกำลัง; น้ำดื่มแต่งกลิ่น; ฟรุตพันช์; ช็อกโกแลตร้อน; ชาเย็น; น้ำเลมอนเนด; โปรตีนเชค; เครื่องดื่มเกลือแร่สำหรับนักกีฬา; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Variedade de bebidas em pó: Café; Bebida de eletrólitos; Bebida energética; Água com sabor; Ponche de frutas; Chocolate quente; Chá gelado; Limonada; Batido de proteína; Bebida desportiva; Outro
sv: Dryckessort i pulverform: Kaffe; Elektrolytdryck; Energidryck; Smaksatt vatten; Fruit punch; Varm choklad; Iste; Citronad; Proteinshake; Sportdryck; Annat
pt-BR: Bebida em pó, variedade: Café; Bebida eletrolítica; Bebida energética; Água aromatizada; Ponche de frutas; Chocolate quente; Chá gelado; Limonada; Shake de proteína; Bebida esportiva; Outros
fr: Assortiment de boissons en poudre: Café; Boisson aux électrolytes; Boisson énergisante; Eau aromatisée; Punch aux fruits; Chocolat chaud; Thé glacé; Limonade; Boisson protéinée; Boisson pour le sport; Autre
nb: Variant av pulverbasert drikkevare: Kaffe; Elektrolyttdrikk; Energidrikk; Vann med smak; Fruktpunsj; Varm sjokolade; Iste; Limonade; Proteinshake; Sportsdrikk; Annet
ro-RO: Sortiment de băutură pudră: Cafea; Băutură cu electroliți; Băutură energizantă; Apă aromată; Punci de fructe; Ciocolată caldă; Ceai cu gheață; Limonadă; Shake proteic; Băutură pentru sportivi; Altele
da: Variant af pulverdrik: Kaffe; Elektrolytdrik; Energidrik; Vand med smag; Frugtpunch; Varm chokolade; Iste; Limonade; Proteinshake; Sportsdrik; Andet
en: Powdered beverage variety: Coffee; Electrolyte drink; Energy drink; Flavored water; Fruit punch; Hot chocolate; Iced tea; Lemonade; Protein shake; Sports drink; Other
cs: Druh instantního nápoje: Káva; Elektrolytový nápoj; Energetický nápoj; Ochucená voda; Ovocný punč; Horká čokoláda; Ledový čaj; Limonáda; Proteinový nápoj; Sportovní nápoj; Jiné
pl: Odmiana napoju w proszku: Kawa; Napój elektrolitowy; Napój energetyczny; Woda smakowa; Poncz owocowy; Gorąca czekolada; Mrożona herbata; Lemoniada; Koktajl białkowy; Napój sportowy; Inne
nl: Soort poederdrank: Koffie; Elektrolytendrank; Energiedrank; Water met een smaakje; Vruchtenpunch; Warme chocolademelk; IJsthee; Limonade; Eiwitshake; Sportdrank; Overig
vi: Loại thức uống dạng bột: Cà phê; Thức uống bổ sung điện giải; Nước tăng lực; Nước có hương vị; Nước trái cây pha; Sô-cô-la nóng; Trà đá; Nước chanh; Thức uống bổ sung protein; Thức uống thể thao; Khác